Utah statutes.
78B-12-218.   Accountability of support provided to benefit child -- Accounting.

(1)  The court or administrative agency which issues the initial or modified order for child support may, upon the petition of the obligor, order prospectively the obligee to furnish an accounting of amounts provided for the child's benefit to the obligor, including an accounting or receipts.

(2)  The court or administrative agency may prescribe the frequency and the form of the accounting which shall include receipts and an accounting.

(3)  The obligor may petition for the accounting only if current on all child support that has been ordered.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

